Rhode Island, session 2025, SB248.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 24-8.1-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 24-8.1 entitled "Relocation
of Utility Services" is hereby amended to read as follows:
24-8.1-2. Relocation of utility facilities necessitated by highway construction.
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law or of any charter or statute, general or special, to
the contrary, whenever state-initiated relocation of utility facilities in the state, owned by private
corporations or, private companies, municipalities, political subdivisions, authorities, or agencies
of the state, whether within or without the limits of public ways, shall become necessary in
connection with a highway project on the federal aid primary or secondary systems or on the
national system of interstate and defense highways, including extensions thereof, for which the
state shall be entitled under any law of the United States to reimbursement from federal funds for
any portion of the cost of the project, then the state may order the relocation of the utility facilities,
and the private corporation, or private company, municipality, political subdivision, agencies of the
state, or authority owning or operating the facilities shall promptly relocate the facilities in
accordance with the order and the state shall reimburse the owner of the utility or utility facility for
the cost of relocation subject to the following limitations and in accordance with the following
formula: for any utility facility that is to be reimbursed federally, in whole or in part, and for any
utility facility that does not qualify for federal reimbursement, the division shall reimburse the
owner fifty percent (50%) of the costs of relocating the utility facility; in no case shall a utility be
reimbursed for any type of betterment; reimbursement is for relocation costs only; the state shall

pay the cost of the relocation to the utility as part of the cost of the federally aided highway project.
A utility relocation shall be eligible for reimbursement pursuant to this section only if it is
completed to the satisfaction of the state within target dates established by the state and in
accordance with design criteria set forth by the state for the relocation in a manner that facilitates
the timely completion of the affected project. Upon compliance and satisfaction of the conditions
of this subsection, the The state shall pay a fifty percent (50%) of the reasonable amount to private
corporations and private companies for the relocation of utilities commencing with highway
projects that are authorized for construction after March 1, 1976.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of law or of any charter or statute, general or special, to
the contrary, whenever state initiated relocation of utility facilities in the state, owned by
municipalities, political subdivisions, authorities, or agencies of the state, whether within or without
the limits of public ways, shall become necessary in connection with a highway project on the
federal aid primary or secondary systems or on the national system of interstate and defense
highways, including extensions thereof, for which the state shall be entitled under any law of the
United States to reimbursement from federal funds for any portion of the cost of the project, then
the state may order the relocation of the utility facilities, and the municipality, political subdivision,
agencies of the state, or authority owning or operating the facilities shall promptly relocate the
facilities in accordance with the order and the state shall pay the cost of the relocation to the utility
as part of the cost of the federally aided highway project.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001396
========
LC001396 - Page 2 of 3